Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1724.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 37 of Title 62 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER FSUSTAINABLE CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECT CONTRACTSec.3761. Short title of subchapter.3762. Definitions.3763. Contracting procedures.3764. Contract provisions.3765. Funding.3766. Construction.§ 3761. Short title of subchapter.123456789101112131415161718 This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the Sustainable Capital Improvement Project Contract Act.§ 3762. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Facility." A building, transportation, distribution system, water system or other structure or technologies associated with a governmental unit that advances the purposes of this subchapter."Financing." Private sector capital that supports the sustainable capital improvement project as provided by a qualified provider."Governmental unit." Any officer, employee, authority, board, bureau, commission, department, agency or institution of a government agency, including, but not limited to, any Commonwealth agency, State-aided institution or any county, city, district, municipal corporation, municipality, municipal authority, political subdivision, school district, educational institution, borough, incorporated town, township, poor district, county institution district, other incorporated district or other public instrumentality which has the authority to contract for the construction, reconstruction, alteration or repair of any public facility."Key performance indicator." A quantifiable indicator that measures how effectively a qualified provider is achieving the objectives of a sustainable capital improvement project. The term includes, but is not limited to, system efficiency, system availability and service response times."Project." A sustainable capital improvement project 20250HB1724PN2124 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 developed pursuant to this subchapter."Project development agreement." An interim agreement entered into between a qualified provider and a governmental unit to finalize project design and cost, structure private project financing and establish the terms and conditions of a sustainable capital improvement project contract."Qualified provider." An individual or business which is responsible and capable of evaluating, recommending, designing, implementing, installing and operating and maintaining equipment to reduce deferred maintenance and improve energy efficiency, sustainability and resilience as determined by the governmental unit."Services." Provisions that address energy and water infrastructure, environmental infrastructure, efficiency, resiliency, electric and other clean vehicle charging, renewable energy, energy technology and other facility needs or requirements."Sustainable capital improvement project." An individual project or projects developed by a governmental unit under this subchapter."Sustainable capital improvement project contract." A contract for the design, construction, financing, asset ownership, operations and maintenance of energy, water, environment, resilience, distribution and sustainability assets and capital project scope elements.§ 3763. Contracting procedures.(a) Entrance.--A governmental unit may enter into a sustainable capital improvement contract with a qualified provider under this subchapter or in accordance with another statutorily authorized procurement process.20250HB1724PN2124 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Sustainable capital improvement contract.--If, in accordance with applicable law, the award of a contract by a governmental unit requires action at a public meeting, a governmental unit may award a sustainable capital improvement contract at a public meeting if the governmental unit has provided public notice, including the purpose of and names of the parties to the contract, in the manner prescribed under 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings). For governmental units that are not required to take actions on contracts at public meetings, the governmental unit may award a sustainable capital improvement contract in accordance with the procedures adopted by the governmental unit and the requirements of applicable law.(c) Competitive sealed proposals.--For the purpose of entering into a sustainable capital improvement contract, all governmental units shall be authorized to utilize the competitive sealed proposal method of procurement. The governmental unit shall evaluate any proposal that meets the requirements of the governmental unit and is timely submitted by a qualified provider. The request for proposals shall be announced through a public notice from the governmental unit which shall administer the program. The request for proposals shall provide all interested parties with sufficient information necessary to submit a timely and responsive proposal.(d) Selection and notice.--The governmental unit shall select the qualified provider that best meets the needs of the governmental unit in accordance with criteria established by the governmental unit. For governmental units that are not required to take actions on contracts at public meetings, the governmental unit shall transmit notice of the award of the 20250HB1724PN2124 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sustainable capital improvement contract to the Legislative Reference Bureau within 30 days for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The notice shall include the names of the parties to the contract and the purpose of the contract. For governmental units that are required to take actions on contracts at public meetings, the public notice shall be made at least 10 days prior to the meeting.(e) Report.--(1) Before the award of a sustainable capital improvement contract, the qualified provider shall provide a report as part of the proposal, which shall be available for public inspection, summarizing estimates of all costs of installation, maintenance, repairs and debt service.(2) The report shall contain a listing of contractors and subcontractors to be used by the qualified provider with respect to the sustainable capital improvement project.(f) Bond.--A qualified provider to whom a contract is awarded shall give a sufficient bond to the governmental unit for faithful performance. Commonwealth agencies shall obtain bonds in accordance with the provisions of section 533 (relating to security and performance bonds). All other governmental units shall obtain bonds in accordance with the act of December 20, 1967 (P.L.869, No.385), known as the Public Works Contractors' Bond Law of 1967.(g) Award of contract.--A governmental unit may enter into a single sustainable capital improvement contract with each responsible provider selected in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter.(h) Project development agreement.--Prior to the execution of a sustainable capital improvement project contract, a 20250HB1724PN2124 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 governmental unit and a qualified provider may enter into a project development agreement under which the project design, project costs, project financing structure, key performance indicators and other applicable terms and conditions shall be finalized.(i) Prevailing wage.--For any sustainable capital improvement project contract, the qualified provider and any contractor or subcontractor performing services as part of the sustainable capital improvement project contract shall ensure that all contractors and subcontractors engaged during the on-site construction, renovation, rehabilitation, reconstruction, demolition, alteration and repair work, other than maintenance work, on any segment of work at the facility, pay to workers not less than the prevailing minimum wage and benefit rates for all crafts or classifications, as determined by the Department of Labor and Industry under the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.(j) Qualifications.--Before the qualified provider enters into a sustainable capital improvement project contract, the qualified provider shall submit an affidavit to the governmental unit to ensure that any contractor or subcontractor performing services as part of the sustainable capital improvement project contract meets all of the following requirements:(1) Maintains all valid licenses, registrations or certificates required by the Federal Government, the Commonwealth or a local government entity that are necessary to do business or perform applicable work.(2) Maintains compliance with the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, 20250HB1724PN2124 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, and bonding and liability insurance requirements as specified in the sustainable capital improvement project contract.(3) Has not defaulted on a project, declared bankruptcy, been debarred or suspended on a project by the Federal Government, the Commonwealth or a government entity within the previous three years.(4) Has not been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony relating to the performance or operation of the business of the contractor or subcontractor within the previous 10 years.(5) Has completed a minimum of the United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration's 10-hour safety training course or similar training sufficient to prepare workers for any hazards that may be encountered during their work.§ 3764. Contract provisions.(a) Payment time.--A sustainable capital improvement project contract may provide that all payments, except obligations on termination of the contract before expiration, shall be made over a period of time.(b) Key performance indices.--A sustainable capital improvement project contract shall include key performance indicators for the services requested by the governmental unit.(c) Payments.--A sustainable capital improvement project contract may provide for payments over a period of time not to exceed 35 years and for the evaluation, recommendation, design, implementation, installation and operation and maintenance of services provided for under this subchapter and in accordance with the following:(1) Payments to a qualified provider who does not meet 20250HB1724PN2124 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 obligations under the key performance indicators shall be adjusted according to the terms of the sustainable capital improvement project contract.(2) A governmental unit shall not be required to make payments under a sustainable capital improvement project contract until project construction is completed and the assets are performing.(d) Improvements not causally connected to a sustainable capital improvement project.--An improvement that is not causally connected to a sustainable capital improvement project may be included in a sustainable capital improvement project if: (1) the total value of the improvement does not exceed 15% of the total value of the sustainable capital improvement project contract; and(2) either:(i) the improvement is necessary to conform to a law, rule or ordinance; or(ii) an analysis within the sustainable capital improvement project contract demonstrates that there is an economic advantage to the governmental unit implementing an improvement as part of the sustainable capital improvement project and the savings justification for the improvement is documented by industry engineering standards.(e) Other expenditures.--A facility alteration which includes expenditures that are required to properly implement a sustainable capital improvement project may be included as part of a sustainable capital improvement project contract, in which case the installation of additional measures may be supervised by the contractor performing the sustainable capital improvement 20250HB1724PN2124 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 project.§ 3765. Funding.(a) Termination.--Sustainable capital improvement project contracts that have terms which extend beyond one fiscal year of the governmental unit must include a provision that allows the governmental unit to terminate the contract if in any fiscal year during the term of the contract the governmental unit does not receive sufficient funds in its annual appropriations to make the payments required under the contract.(b) Funds.--A governmental unit may use funds designated for operating, utilities or capital expenditures for any sustainable capital improvement project contract, including, without limitation, for purchases on an installment payment or lease purchase basis.(c) Grants, subsidies or other payments.--Grants, subsidies or other payments from the Commonwealth to a governmental unit shall not be reduced as a result of use of a sustainable capital improvement project contract during the life of the contract.§ 3766. Construction.Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to abrogate any duty to comply with prevailing wage or residency requirements contained in any other act.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1724PN2124 - 9 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223